District of Columbia statutes.
26-1318

Annual reports — Publication; contents; verification.

Every such company shall annually, within 20 days after the 1st of January of each year, make a report to the Superintendent of Banking and Financial Institutions [Commissioner of the Department of Insurance, Securities, and Banking], which shall be published in a newspaper in the District, which shall state the amount of capital and of the proportion actually paid, the amount of debts, and the gross earnings for the year ending December 31st then next previous, together with their expenses, which report shall be signed by the president and a majority of the directors or trustees, and shall be verified by the oath of the president, secretary, and at least 3 of the directors or trustees; provided, however, that trust companies which are required to file and to publish reports under the provisions of § 161 of Title 12, United States Code , as amended, shall not be required to make or publish the annual report required under this section.

History

Mar. 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1307, ch. 854, § 730
July 1, 1902, 32 Stat. 619, ch. 1352, § 6(5)
Nov. 30, 1945, 59 Stat. 588, ch. 499
Nov. 23, 1985, D.C. Law 6-63, § 106(a)(12)
as added Apr. 11, 1986, D.C. Law 6-107, § 2(k), 33 DCR 1168

Section References

This section is referenced in § 26-1319.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 26-418.
1973 Ed., § 26-318.